Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2145HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2693 Section 1. Section 704.13, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 704.13 Immunity. 3 1. A person who is justified in using reasonable force 4 against an aggressor in defense of oneself, another person, 5 or property pursuant to section 704.4 is immune from criminal 6 or civil liability for all damages incurred by the aggressor 7 pursuant to the application of reasonable force. 8 2. There shall be a presumption under this section that the 9 person reasonably believed that such use of force was necessary 10 to defend the person, another person, or property from what the 11 person reasonably believed to be the use of or imminent use of 12 unlawful force by another person. 13 3. A law enforcement agency may use standard procedures 14 for investigating the use or threatened use of force, but the 15 law enforcement agency shall not arrest the person for using 16 or threatening to use force unless the law enforcement agency 17 makes the determination that there is probable cause to believe 18 that the force that was used or was threatened to be used was 19 unlawful. 20 4. In a criminal prosecution or civil action, when a 21 justified use of force immunity has been raised by a person at 22 a pretrial immunity hearing, the burden of proof, to be carried 23 by clear and convincing evidence, is on the party seeking to 24 overcome the immunity provided in subsection 1. The court 25 shall hold a pretrial immunity hearing within fourteen days of 26 the person filing a motion to dismiss the criminal prosecution 27 or civil action on the grounds of immunity. 28 5. In a criminal prosecution, a determination by the court 29 that there is probable cause to believe that the criminal 30 offense was committed by the person and that the person 31 should stand trial for the criminal offense must include a 32 determination that the personâs use of force was not justified. 33